Utah statutes.
54-7-24.   Injunction to stop violations or threatened violations.

Whenever the commission, or the Department of Transportation where the safety of public carriers is involved, shall be of the opinion that any public utility is failing or omitting, or is about to fail or omit, to do anything required of it by law, or by any order, decision, rule, direction or requirement of the commission, or where applicable, the department, or is doing anything, or is about to do anything, or is permitting anything, or is about to permit anything, to be done, contrary to or in violation of law or of any order, decision, rule, direction or requirement of the commission or department, it shall direct the commencement of an action or proceeding in the name of the state, for the purpose of having such violations or threatened violations stopped or prevented.

